Hawaii statutes.
[§466D-5] Powers and duties of the
director. In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law,
the director shall have the powers and duties to:

(1) Grant, deny, renew, refuse to renew, restore,
terminate, reinstate, condition, restrict, suspend, or revoke a license issued
pursuant to this chapter;

(2) Grant permission to a person to practice
respiratory care and to use the title of "licensed respiratory
therapist" or a description indicating that the person is a licensed
respiratory therapist in this State;

(3) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules pursuant to chapter
91 as the director finds necessary to carry out this chapter;

(4) Administer, coordinate, and enforce this chapter;

(5) Prepare and administer examinations pursuant to
the requirements of this chapter;

(6) Establish the criteria for successful passage of
an examination administered pursuant to this chapter;

(7) Discipline a licensed respiratory therapist on
grounds specified by this chapter or chapter 436B or for any violation of rules
adopted by the director pursuant to this chapter;

(8) Refuse to license a person for failure to meet
the licensing requirements in this chapter or for any reason specified by this
chapter as grounds to discipline a respiratory therapist; and

(9) Appoint an advisory committee composed of
practicing respiratory therapists to assist with the implementation of this
chapter. [L 2010, c 178, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next